Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-113.01
Legislative findings.

In order to declare the intent of the present Legislature and to effect the original intent of sections 18-1724 and 20-113, the Legislature finds that civil rights are a local as well as state concern and the Legislature desires to provide for the local enforcement and enactment of civil rights legislation concurrent with the authority of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1979, LB 438, § 1.